Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201677-5712
Nebraska average
weekly wage, defined.

Nebraska average weekly wage
for any year
means the most recent average weekly wage paid by all employers in all counties
in Nebraska as reported by the Department of Labor by October 1 of the year
prior to application.

Laws 2005, LB 312, § 34;

Laws 2008, LB895, § 10;

Laws 2013, LB34, § 3.